Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska33-107.03
Court automation
fee.

In addition to all other court costs assessed
according to law, a court automation fee of eight dollars shall be taxed
as costs for each case filed in each county court, separate juvenile court,
and district court, including appeals to such courts, and for each appeal
and original action filed in the Court of Appeals and the Supreme Court. The
fees shall be remitted to the State Treasurer on forms prescribed by the State
Treasurer within ten days after the end of each month. The State Treasurer
shall credit the fees to the Supreme Court Automation Cash Fund.

Laws 2002, Second Spec. Sess., LB 13, § 2;

Laws 2009, LB35, § 24.